District of Columbia statutes.
22-934

Criminal negligence.

A person who knowingly, willfully or through a wanton, reckless or willful indifference fails to discharge a duty to provide care and services necessary to maintain the physical and mental health of a vulnerable adult, including but not limited to providing adequate food, clothing, medicine, shelter, supervision and medical services, that a reasonable person would deem essential for the well-being of the vulnerable adult is guilty of criminal negligence.

June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-301, § 204, 47 DCR 7039